Hawaii statutes.
[§342D-110]
Fine schedules for illegal discharges. (a) Any person who fails to comply
with any requirement of this part shall be subject to the fines established by
the department pursuant to subsection (b).

(b) The department shall by rule under chapter
91, establish fines for the failure to comply with any requirement of this
part. [L 2005, c 217, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next